Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1635
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act are to regulate all dams and associated reservoirs for the protection of public health, safety, and welfare and to minimize the adverse consequences associated with the potential failure of such dams and reservoirs.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 35.